Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-405.02
Consolidated county officers; county boards; adjust election district boundaries.

On or before February 15 of the year of the general election at which consolidated county officers are to be elected, the county boards of each county involved in the consolidation agreement shall meet and adjust jointly the boundaries for the election districts for the consolidated offices.

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 20.